Utah statutes.
23-14-8.   Director -- Executive authority and control -- Power to declare emergency seasons.

The director of the Division of Wildlife Resources, under administrative supervision of the executive director of the Department of Natural Resources, shall have:

(1)  executive authority and control of the Division of Wildlife Resources so that policies of the Wildlife Board are carried out in accordance with the laws of this state;

(2)  authority over all personnel matters;

(3)   full control of all property acquired and held for the purposes specified in this title; and

(4)  authority to declare emergency closed or open seasons in the interest of the wildlife resources of the state.

